Illinois, session 104th, HB1720.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Retail 5Sale of Tianeptine Prohibition Act. 6    Section 5. Retail sale of tianeptine products. 7    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, no person shall sell, offer 8to sell, or distribute in the State any product containing 9tianeptine.10    (b) This Act does not apply to any product containing 11tianeptine that is lawfully dispensed or prescribed by a 12pharmacist or a health care professional. In this subsection 13(b), "health care professional" means any person who treats 14human ailments and is subject to licensure or regulation by 15this State, including students and residents. 16    Section 10. Sentence. A violation of Section 5 is a 17business offense, punishable by a minimum fine of $1,500 for 18each violation. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 201, 2026.